Utah statutes.
31A-2-303.   Notice.

(1)  If the commissioner determines that the number of persons affected by a proposed action is so great as to render it impracticable to serve each person affected with a copy of an order, notice of hearing, or other notice, the commissioner shall:

(a)  provide a copy of the order, notice of hearing, or other notice to all persons who have filed with the department a general request to be informed of this type of action, or if fewer than 10 persons have requested this type of notice, provide a copy to those who have and also to others affected by the notice or order so that at least 10 persons receive the notice or order who are collectively representative of the class of persons whose legal status, pecuniary interests, or other substantial interests will be affected by the proposed action; and

(b)  publish a copy of the order, notice of hearing, or other notice under Subsection (2).

(2)  When this title requires the commissioner to publish an order, notice of hearing, or other document, the commissioner shall cause the notice or order to be published:

(a)  at least once during each of the four weeks preceding the hearing, effective date, or other critical event, in at least two newspapers with sufficient circulation and appropriate location to best provide actual notice; and

(b)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for four weeks preceding the hearing, effective date, or other critical event.

